Vermont, session 2025-2026, H229.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. FINDINGS
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) In 2023 and 2024, Vermont experienced extreme flooding and other
climate-fueled disasters that devastated farms and other working lands
businesses across the State.
VT LEG #380240 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.229
2025 Page 2 of 11
(2) Many existing State and federal programs that are designed to
support farms and forestry operations are difficult to access, are
administratively burdensome, are not equitably distributed to small- and
medium-scale farmers and forestry operations, and currently do not meet the
needs of Vermont farmers and forestry operation in a holistic way.
(3) In particular, because federal crop insurance programs are not
designed to serve the needs of smaller scale or more diversified farming
operations, many Vermont farmers are not covered by crop insurance.
(4) The purpose of State funding should be to ensure that farms and
forestry operations remain viable in Vermont to ensure food security, climate
resilience, rural economic vitality, and environmental health.
(5) The State should be continuously investing in farms and forestry
operations in a way that makes them more resilient to current and future
challenges.
(6) The State should establish a permanent funding support program to:
(A) maintain the viability of farms and forestry operations in
Vermont in order to ensure food security, climate resilience, rural economic
vitality, and environmental health;
(B) continuously invest in farms and forestry operations in a way that
makes them more resilient to current and future challenges; and
VT LEG #380240 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.229
2025 Page 3 of 11
(C) provide a source of relief funds permanently available to farmers
and forestry operations impacted by climate emergencies and extreme weather.
Sec. 2. 6 V.S.A. chapter 207 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 207. PROMOTION AND, MARKETING, AND SUPPORT OF
VERMONT FARMS, FOODS, AND PRODUCTS
* * *
Subchapter 4. Farm and Forestry Operations Security Special Fund
§ 4631. DEFINITIONS
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Eligible weather condition” means any of the following weather
conditions that are found to be closely correlated with agricultural or forest
operation income losses:
(A) high winds;
(B) excessive moisture, intense precipitation, or flooding;
(C) extreme heat;
(D) abnormal freeze conditions;
(E) widespread fire event;
(F) hail;
(G) drought; or
(H) any other severe weather or growing conditions impacting
agricultural or forestry operations income, as determined by the Review Board.
VT LEG #380240 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.229
2025 Page 4 of 11
(2) “Farm” means a parcel or parcels of land owned, leased, or managed
by a person and devoted primarily to farming and that is subject to regulation
under the Required Agricultural Practices.
(3) “Farm and Forestry Operations Security Special Fund Review
Board” or “Review Board” means the Board established under section 4634 of
this title.
(4) “Farming” has the same meaning as in section 2.16 of the Required
Agricultural Practices.
(5) “Forestry operation” has the same meaning as in 10 V.S.A. § 2602.
§ 4632. FARM AND FORESTRY OPERATIONS SECURITY SPECIAL
FUND
(a) There is established the Farm and Forestry Operations Security Special
Fund to be administered by the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets
and that shall be managed in accordance with 32 V.S.A. chapter 7, subchapter
5. The Fund shall consist of:
(1) funds appropriated by the General Assembly;
(2) funds from public and private sources that the Secretary accepts for
the Fund; and
(3) funds from federal government aid for State support of farmers
suffering income loss due to weather conditions.
VT LEG #380240 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.229
2025 Page 5 of 11
(b) The Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets shall ensure language
accessibility of the Fund through procurement and provision of interpretation
and translation services.
(c) All balances in the Fund at the end of any fiscal year shall be carried
forward and remain part of the Fund.
§ 4633. FARM AND FORESTRY OPERATIONS SECURITY SPECIAL
FUND; GRANTS
(a) The Secretary, after consultation with the Review Board, shall award
grants from the Farm and Forestry Operations Security Special Fund to farms
and forestry operations that have incurred financial losses or expenses due to
an eligible weather condition.
(1) Grants from the Fund shall be in an amount that reimburses a farm
of forestry operation for up to 50 percent of uninsured or otherwise uncovered
losses due to eligible weather conditions, up to a maximum award of
$150,000.00 total per year per qualified applicant farm or forestry operation.
(2) The Secretary shall establish criteria for the amount of an award
based on the annual net income of the farm of forestry operation in relation to
the median net income of all farms in Vermont.
(3) The Secretary may verify the occurrence of an eligible weather
condition claimed under this section through use of available data from the
National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration, from other federal or State
VT LEG #380240 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.229
2025 Page 6 of 11
certified weather data sources, or from other public or private weather or
satellite data or models.
(4) Losses reimbursable by a grant under this section include:
(A) wages or compensation;
(B) replacement of lost income from destroyed crops, livestock, or
timber;
(C) debt payments or other ongoing expenses;
(D) costs of replanting;
(E) livestock feed replacement costs;
(F) infrastructure or equipment repair and replacement;
(G) repair of farm roads or logging roads; or
(H) other losses as determined by the Secretary after consultation
with the Review Board.
(b) The Secretary shall develop a streamlined application for awards under
this section that shall include:
(1) a brief description of the damage that occurred;
(2) attestation of an eligible weather condition or event;
(3) an estimate of losses; and
(4) a year-end financial statement.
VT LEG #380240 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.229
2025 Page 7 of 11
(c) An application for an award under this section may be made at any
time, and the Fund may only close the application process upon award of all
appropriated funds for the relevant fiscal year.
(d) Applications for an award under this section shall be processed in the
order received, but an application shall not be ready for evaluation until the
Secretary determines that the application is administratively complete and
includes all documentation required by the Secretary.
(e) All administratively complete applications shall be evaluated by the
Review Board. Within one week of receipt of an administratively complete
application, the Review Board by majority vote shall recommend to the
Secretary whether to issue a grant to the applicant. If the Review Board
recommends an award under this section, the Secretary shall issue the award
within two weeks of the date of the Review Board’s recommendation.
§ 4634. FARM AND FORESTRY OPERATIONS SECURITY SPECIAL
FUND REVIEW BOARD
(a) Creation. There is created the Farm and Forestry Operations Security
Special Fund Review Board, which for administrative purposes shall be
attached to the Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets.
(b) Organization of Board. The Board shall be composed of:
(1) the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets or designee, who
shall serve as chair;
VT LEG #380240 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.229
2025 Page 8 of 11
(2) the State Chief Recovery Officer or designee;
(3) representatives of three organizations or entities with experience
granting relief funds or technical assistance to farmers or forestry operations,
appointed by the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets;
(4) two farmers who have received relief funding, appointed by the
Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets; and
(5) two forestry operators who have received relief funding, appointed
by the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets.
(c) Member terms. The members designated in subdivision (b)(3) of this
section shall be appointed to initial terms of two years. Thereafter, each
appointed member shall serve a term of three years or until the member’s
earlier resignation or removal. The members designated in subdivision (b)(4)
of this section shall be appointed to initial terms of one year. The members
designated in subdivision (b)(5) of this section shall be appointed to initial
terms of two years. Thereafter, each appointed member shall serve a term of
three years or until the member’s earlier resignation or removal. A vacancy
shall be filled by the appointing authority for the remainder of the unexpired
term. An appointed member shall not serve more than three consecutive three-
year terms.
(d) Powers.
VT LEG #380240 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.229
2025 Page 9 of 11
(1) The Review Board shall review applications for assistance under this
section, assess the accuracy and validity of the applications, and recommend to
the Secretary applicants who should receive assistance under this section.
(2) In order to ensure that the Fund is meeting the needs of Vermont’s
agricultural and forestry operations community, the Review Board annually
shall review the application process, eligibility criteria, distribution, and
accessibility of the Fund. The Review Board annually shall recommend to the
House Committee on Agriculture, Food Resiliency and Forestry and the Senate
Committee on Agriculture ways to improve the effectiveness of the Fund.
(e) Officers; committees. The Board may elect officers, establish one or
more committees or subcommittees, and adopt procedural rules as it shall
determine necessary and appropriate to perform its work.
(f) Quorum; meetings; voting. A majority of the sitting members shall
constitute a quorum, and action taken by the Board may be authorized by a
majority of the members present and voting at any regular or special meeting at
which a quorum is present. The Board may permit any or all members to
participate in a regular or special meeting by, or conduct the meeting through
the use of, any means of communication, including an electronic,
telecommunications, and video- or audio-conferencing conference telephone
call, by which all members participating may simultaneously or sequentially
VT LEG #380240 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.229
2025 Page 10 of 11
communicate with each other during the meeting. A member participating in a
meeting by this means is deemed to be present in person at the meeting.
(g) Compensation. Private sector members shall be entitled to per diem
compensation authorized under 32 V.S.A. § 1010(b) for each day spent in the
performance of their duties, and each member shall be reimbursed from the
Fund for the member’s actual and necessary expenses incurred in carrying out
the member’s duties.
Sec. 3. FUNDING INTENT; REPORT ON FUTURE APPROPRIATIONS
(a) It is the intent of the General Assembly that the Farm and Forestry
Operations Security Special Fund receive an annual appropriation equal to 50
percent of the average documented farm losses from eligible weather
conditions, as defined in 6 V.S.A. chapter 207, subchapter 4, averaged over
previous years.
(b) To determine the appropriate funds for deposit to the Farm and Forestry
Operations Security Special Fund, the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and
Markets shall recommend to the Farm and Forestry Operations Security
Special Fund Review Board on or before December 15, 2025, an amount to be
appropriated to the Farm and Forestry Operations Security Special Fund based
on the farm losses from eligible weather conditions averaged over the previous
three calendar years. On or before January 15, 2026, the Farm and Forestry
Operations Security Special Fund Review Board shall submit to the Senate
VT LEG #380240 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.229
2025 Page 11 of 11
Committees on Agriculture and on Appropriations and the House Committees
on Agriculture, Food Resiliency, and Forestry and on Appropriations a
recommended appropriation to the Farm and Forestry Operations Security
Special Fund.
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #380240 v.1